Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,354
Coaster, roller skates, sled, skis, or toy vehicle; prohibited acts.

Any person who rides upon any coaster, roller skates, sled, skis, or toy vehicle shall not attach such or himself or herself to any vehicle upon a roadway.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 450.